Utah statutes.
20A-5-706.   Damage, alteration, or theft of election equipment -- Penalty.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to intentionally or knowingly damage, modify, steal, tamper with, or destroy a voting device, voting equipment, or an automated voting system.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 326, 2006 General Session

